Washington statutes.
RCW 32.16.110

Officers.

The board of trustees shall elect from their number, or otherwise, a president and two vice presidents and such other officers as they may deem fit.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.16.110. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 30; RRS s 3359.]